en: Trainer mounting type: Direct drive; Platform; Roller; Smart bike; Wheel-on; Other
ja: トレーナーマウントタイプ: ダイレクトドライブ; プラットフォーム; ローラー; スマートバイク; ホイールオン; その他
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на тренажор: Директно задвижване; Платформа; Ролер; Смарт велосипед; С прикрепено колело; Друго
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt của xe đạp tập cố định: Dẫn động trực tiếp; Dạng bục; Con lăn; Xe đạp thông minh; Bánh xe nằm trên rulo; Khác
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งเทรนเนอร์จักรยาน: ไดเรกต์ไดรฟ์; แพลตฟอร์ม; โรลเลอร์; สมาร์ทไบค์; ติดล้อ; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ uchycení trenažeru: Přímý pohon; Plošina; Válcové; Chytré kolo; Odporové (s kolem); Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže trenažerja: Neposredni pogon; Platforma; Valji; Pametno kolo; Pritrditev na kolo; Drugo
de: Heimtrainer-Montageart: Direktantrieb; Plattform; Rolle; Smart-Bike; Wheel-on; Sonstige
fi: Apupyörien kiinnitystyyppi: Suoraveto; Alusta; Rulla; Älypyörä; Pyörään kiinnitettävä; Muu
ko: 트레이너 장착 유형: 다이렉트 드라이브; 플랫폼; 롤러; 스마트 자전거; 휠온; 기타
zh-TW: 訓練器安裝類型: 直驅式; 平台式; 滾筒式; 智慧型自行車; 夾持式; 其他
pl: Typ mocowania trenażera: Napęd bezpośredni; Platforma; Rolki; Rower inteligentny (Smart bike); Z napędem na koło (wheel-on); Inne
lt-LT: Treniruoklio montavimo tipas: Tiesioginė pavara; Platforma; Volas; Išmanusis dviratis; Tvirtinamas prie rato; Kita
nl: Type trainermontage: Directe aandrijving; Platform; Roller; Smartbike; Wheel-on; Overig
ro-RO: Tip de montare a bicicletei: Acționare directă; Platformă; Role; Bicicletă inteligentă; Prindere pe roată; Altele
fr: Type de fixation du rouleau d'entraînement: Entraînement direct; Plateforme; Rouleau; Vélo intelligent; Sur roue; Autre
it: Tipo di montaggio del trainer: A trazione diretta; A piattaforma; A rulli; Smart bike; Wheel-on; Altro
da: Monteringstype for hometrainer: Direct drive; Platform; Rulle; Smart-cykel; Wheel-on; Andet
zh-CN: 训练器安装类型: 直驱; 平台; 滚轮; 智能自行车; 固定后轮式; 其他
es: Tipo de montaje del dispositivo de entrenamiento: Transmisión directa; Plataforma; Rodillo; Bicicleta inteligente; Sobre la rueda; Otro
nb: Monteringstype for treningsprodukt: Direktedrevet; Plattform; Rulle; Smartsykkel; Hjulmontert; Annet
sv: Monteringstyp för trainer: Direktdrift; Plattform; Rulle; Smartcykel; Hjulmonterad; Övrigt
ru: Тип крепления тренажера: Прямой привод; Платформа; Роллерный; Смарт-велосипед; С установкой колеса; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do simulador: Transmissão direta; Plataforma; Rolo; Bicicleta inteligente; Com roda (wheel-on); Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de fixação do rolo de treino para bicicleta: Transmissão direta; Plataforma; Rolo; Bicicleta inteligente; Com fixação da roda; Outro
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης εξαρτήματος προπόνησης: Άμεση μετάδοση; Πλατφόρμα; Ράουλο; Έξυπνο ποδήλατο; Με πίσω τροχό; Άλλο
tr: Antrenman cihazı montaj tipi: Doğrudan tahrikli; Platform; Merdane; Akıllı bisiklet; Tekerlek üstü; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia trenažéra: Priamy pohon; Plošina; Valce; Inteligentný bicykel; Na koleso; Iné
hu: Edzőeszköz rögzítési típusa: Közvetlen hajtás; Platform; Görgő; Okos kerékpár; Kerékre rögzíthető; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže trenera: Izravni pogon; Platforma; Valjak; Pametni bicikl; Pričvršćenje na kotač; Ostalo